dev/dout.nouns.shemp.dix
    <pardef n="פיוט__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יי</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ליווי__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="הזי/ה__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ית</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתי</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתנו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתכם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתכן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="שינוי"><i>שינוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיבוש"><i>גיבוש</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ייפוי"><i>ייפוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיבוי"><i>גיבוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בידוי"><i>בידוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="געגוע"><i>געגוע</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הנחיה"><i>הנחי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="גינוי"><i>גינוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תגבור"><i>תגבור</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיבוי"><i>עיבוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הטיה"><i>הטי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="תגמול"><i>תגמול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ליווי"><i>ליווי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קנטור"><i>קנטור</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיסול"><i>פיסול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיוס"><i>פיוס</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="וידוי"><i>וידוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הזניה"><i>הזני</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ריכוז"><i>ריכוז</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיכוי"><i>פיכוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ביאוס"><i>ביאוס</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שכלול"><i>שכלול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הרפיה"><i>הרפי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="זיהוי"><i>זיהוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קרטוע"><i>קרטוע</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גילוי"><i>גילוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="בישור"><i>בישור</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="התוויה"><i>התווי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="צידוד"><i>צידוד</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הפניה"><i>הפני</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="עיכוב"><i>עיכוב</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כינוי"><i>כינוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיטוי"><i>חיטוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תקתוק"><i>תקתוק</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הקשיה"><i>הקשי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="איתור"><i>איתור</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="העוויה"><i>העווי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התניה"><i>התני</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="מינוי"><i>מינוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="החניה"><i>החני</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="כילוי"><i>כילוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לבלוב"><i>לבלוב</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הזיה"><i>הזי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הבניה"><i>הבני</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קרקוע"><i>קרקוע</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הפליה"><i>הפלי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="עידוד"><i>עידוד</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיצוי"><i>פיצוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פיגוג"><i>פיגוג</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניקוי"><i>ניקוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הרזיה"><i>הרזי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הטעיה"><i>הטעי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הפריה"><i>הפרי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="דידוי"><i>דידוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="השקיה"><i>השקי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ביכור"><i>ביכור</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הכהיה"><i>הכהי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="תמלול"><i>תמלול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיקוי"><i>חיקוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="השהיה"><i>השהי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ציווי"><i>ציווי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="השעיה"><i>השעי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ספרור"><i>ספרור</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיסוי"><i>שיסוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הודיה"><i>הודי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חיזוי"><i>חיזוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ענטוז"><i>ענטוז</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הגליה"><i>הגלי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ריפוי"><i>ריפוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הבהוב"><i>הבהוב</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פישוק"><i>פישוק</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מילוט"><i>מילוט</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נטרול"><i>נטרול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גירוי"><i>גירוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיסוי"><i>מיסוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="נדנוד"><i>נדנוד</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צחצוח"><i>צחצוח</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הקהיה"><i>הקהי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הקניה"><i>הקני</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="מילוי"><i>מילוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יידוע"><i>יידוע</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ליבוי"><i>ליבוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ציפוי"><i>ציפוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תינוי"><i>תינוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ייחול"><i>ייחול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הרוויה"><i>הרווי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הרביה"><i>הרבי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="החשיה"><i>החשי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="אמלול"><i>אמלול</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אידוי"><i>אידוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צילוק"><i>צילוק</i><par n="פיוט__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ביטוי"><i>ביטוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="השריה"><i>השרי</i><par n="הזי/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ניכוי"><i>ניכוי</i><par n="ליווי__n_m"/></e>
